Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF5182.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 353.27, subdivision 2, is amended to read: Subd. 2. General employees retirement plan; employee contribution. (a) For a basic member of the general employees retirement plan of the Public Employees Retirement Association, the employee contribution is 9.10 percent of salary. For a coordinated member of the general employees retirement plan of the Public Employees Retirement Association, the employee contribution is the following percentage of salary plus any contribution rate adjustment under subdivision 3b: Effective after December 31, 2010 6.25 Effective January 1, 2015 6.5 new text begin For school employees: new text end new text begin Effective July 1, 2026 new text end new text begin 5.5 new text end (b) These contributions must be made by deduction from salary as defined in section 353.01, subdivision 10, in the manner provided in subdivision 4. If any portion of a member's salary is paid from other than public funds, the member's employee contribution must be based on the total salary received by the member from all sources. Sec. 2. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 353.27, subdivision 3, is amended to read: Subd. 3. General employees retirement plan; employer contribution. (a) For a basic member of the general employees retirement plan of the Public Employees Retirement Association, the employer contribution is 9.10 percent of salary. For a coordinated member of the general employees retirement plan of the Public Employees Retirement Association, the employer contribution is the following percentage of salary plus any contribution rate adjustment under subdivision 3b: Effective after December 31, 2010 6.25 Effective January 1, 2015 6.5 new text begin For school employees: new text end new text begin Effective July 1, 2026 new text end new text begin 7.5 new text end (b) This contribution must be made from funds available to the employing subdivision by the means and in the manner provided in section 353.28.